California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------

70215.

In such case the county auditor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the district, ascertained from the assessments referred to in Section 70214 as equalized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70216.

The board shall on or before the first day of September fix the rate of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each one hundred dollars ($100) using as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditor, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board. These acts by the board shall constitute a valid assessment of the property and a valid levy of the taxes so fixed but the rate of taxation shall not exceed the limit imposed by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70217.

The board shall immediately after fixing the rate of taxes as above provided transmit to the county auditor of the county a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70218.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district, under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70219.

Whenever any real property has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurer in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70220.

All taxes levied under this part are a lien on the property on which they are levied. The enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this part so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Retail Transactions and Use Tax [70223. - 70223.5.]

70223.

A retail transactions and use tax ordinance may be adopted by the board in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure vote to authorize its enactment at a special election called for that purpose by the board. Notwithstanding Sections 7261 and 7262 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the retail transactions and use tax ordinance shall provide for imposition of a tax at a rate of one-half of 1 percent or at a lower rate specified in the
 ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 343, Sec. 28.1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

70223.1.

Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing not less than 180 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

70223.2.

The district may contract with the State Board of Equalization for its service in the preparations necessary to administer a transactions and use tax ordinance. The costs to be covered by the contract are to be for services of the types described in Section 7272 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for preparatory work up to the date of the adoption of the ordinance. Any dispute as to the amount of the costs shall be resolved in the same manner as provided in that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

70223.3.

Prior to the operative date of the transactions and use tax ordinance, the district shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

70223.4.

If the district shall not have contracted with the State Board of Equalization prior to the operative date of its transactions and use tax ordinance, it shall nevertheless so contract, and, in such case, the operative date shall be the first day of the first calendar quarter following the execution of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------

70223.5.

Repeal of the transactions and use tax ordinance shall not be operative earlier than the first day of the first calendar quarter following the adoption of the ordinance of repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bonds [70225. - 70266.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance [70225. - 70237.]

70225.

The district may from time to time incur a bonded indebtedness as provided in this chapter to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing or completing the whole or any portion of any transit facilities, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district. The total amount of bonds issued and outstanding shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the assessed value of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the County of Marin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70226.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the public interest or necessity demands the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any transit facilities or any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, the cost of which will be too great to be paid out of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district, it may at any subsequent meeting of the board provide by ordinance for the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purpose set forth in the resolution to
 the voters of the district at a special bond election held for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70231.

The ordinance calling a special bond election shall fix the date on which the election will be held, and the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against incurring the indebtedness. It shall also recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the transit facilities, works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property proposed to be acquired, constructed, or completed, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 6 percent per annum, payable semiannually or annually the
 first year and thereafter semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70232.

Propositions for incurring indebtedness for more than one object or purpose may be submitted at the same election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70233.

Any special bond election may be held separately, or may be consolidated with any other election authorized by law at which the voters of the district may vote. If a special bond election is consolidated with any other election, the provisions of this chapter setting forth the procedure for the calling and holding of the special bond election shall be complied with, except that the ordinance calling the election need not set forth the election precincts, polling places, and officers of election, but may provide that the precincts, polling places, and officers of election shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings calling the
 election with which the special bond election is consolidated, and shall refer to the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings by number and title, or by other definite description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70234.

The ordinance shall be published, and no other notice of election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70235.

The board shall comply with Article 3 (commencing with Section 9160) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, the provisions of which are applicable to any bond election held pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 202.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

70236.

The votes of sixty percent (60%) of all voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70237.

If the proposition submitted at a special bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the board shall not within six months after the election hold another special election for the submission of a proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness substantially the same as the proposition voted upon at the prior election unless a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast at the last general statewide election is filed with the board, requesting that the proposition, or a proposition substantially the same, be submitted at an election to be called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form and Content [70240. - 70243.]

70240.

Bonds authorized by this chapter shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board; except that payment shall begin not later than 10 years from the date thereof and shall be completed in not more than 50 years from that date.

The board may divide any issue of bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter into two or more series, and may fix different dates of issuance and different maturity dates for the bonds of each series. The bonds of each series shall mature serially in amounts to be fixed by the board, and the board shall fix a date not more than 10 years from the date of issuance of each series for the earliest
 maturity of such series, and shall fix a date not more than 50 years from the date of issuance of each series for the final maturity of such series.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of bonds, a district may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates, or receipts, of any denomination whatsoever, with or without coupon, and in such form as may be prescribed by the board, to be exchanged for definite bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70241.

The bonds shall be issued in such denominations as the board determines, except that no bonds shall be issued of a denomination less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in the bond, and with interest at the rate specified therein, payable semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70242.

The board may at any time prior to the issuance and sale of any bonds provide for the call and redemption of any or all of the bonds on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity at not exceeding the par value and accrued interest plus a premium of not exceeding 5 percent upon the principal amount of the bonds, in which event the call price fixed by the board shall be set forth on the face of the bond. Notice of such redemption shall be published. If there is no newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, then the publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the county in which
 the district or any part thereof is situated. The first publication shall be at least 30 days prior to the date fixed for the redemption. After the date fixed for such redemption interest on the bonds thereafter shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70243.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the board or by such officer of the district as the board shall by resolution authorize and designate for that purpose. They shall also be signed by the treasurer, and be countersigned by the auditor. The coupons of the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and be signed by the treasurer. All signatures and countersignatures, except one of the signatures or countersignatures on the bonds, may be printed, lithographed or engraved. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature is
 nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issue and Sale [70245. - 70246.]

70245.

The bonds may be issued and sold for not less than their par value, but otherwise as the board determines. Before selling any bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as the board may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either again give notice inviting bids or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70246.

All premiums and accrued interest received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds. The remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the district treasury to the credit of the proper fund, and shall be used exclusively for the objects or purposes for which the bonds were voted; provided that when such objects and purposes have been accomplished any moneys remaining shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds, and that when all principal of and interest on the bonds shall have been paid, any balance of money then remaining
 shall be transferred to the general fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Status as Investments [70260. - 70261.]

70260.

All bonds including refunding bonds issued by a district are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State School Fund and for all sinking funds under the control of the State Treasurer. Whenever any money or funds may by law be invested in or loaned upon the security of bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts, in the State, such money or funds may be invested in or loaned upon the security of the bonds of the district; and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, or school districts by law may be used as security for
 the faithful performance or execution of any court or private trust or of any other act, bonds of the district may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70261.

All bonds of the district, to the same extent as bonds of any other municipality, are legal for use by any state or national bank or banks in the State as security for the deposit of funds of the State or of any county, city and county, city, municipality or other public or municipal corporation within the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Validation [70263. - 70263.]

70263.

An action to determine the validity of bonds, including refunding bonds, may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue Bonds [70265. - 70266.]

70265.

As an alternative procedure for the raising of funds, the district may issue bonds, payable from revenues of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions of which are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70266.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include transit facilities and any and all parts thereof and all additions, extensions and improvements thereto and all other facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed or completed by the district. A district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for any one or more facilities or enterprises authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by a district or,
 in the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for the acquisition, construction and completion of any one of such facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the facilities or works authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the directors may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Annexation [70270. - 70277.]

70270.

Territory within Marin County may be annexed to the district in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70271.

Whenever the board finds and determines that additional territory will be benefited by annexation to the district, it shall pass a resolution to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70272.

The resolution shall be passed by a vote of two-thirds of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70273.

The resolution shall:

(a) Describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed.

(b) Designate the proposed annexation by an appropriate name.

(c) Declare that the area to be annexed to the district will be benefited by such annexation.

(d) Name the time and place for the hearing of objections by any person interested in the proposed annexation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70274.

The resolution, together with the names of the members of the board, voting for and against it shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper published in the territory proposed to be annexed, or if there is no such paper, then in some newspaper of general circulation, circulated in such territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70275.

On the day fixed for hearing or any day to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall hear and consider any objections presented to the annexation of the territory. After the hearing of objections, if it shall be determined by a vote of two-thirds of all the members of the board that the territory proposed to be annexed will be benefited by such annexation, the board shall proceed to fix and determine the boundaries of the territory to be annexed to the district, provided, however, that if there is filed with the clerk of the board prior to the close of said hearing, written protests against said annexation signed by fifty percent (50%) or more of the registered voters
 within the area proposed to be annexed, then said annexation proceedings shall be terminated by board action and the board shall not within six months after said termination adopt a resolution pursuant to Section 70271 applicable to the same or substantially the same area involved in the prior terminated proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70276.

After making all necessary and proper changes in the boundaries, by a resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of the members, the board shall order the annexation of the territory so described. The resolution, together with the names of the members of the board voting for and against the same shall be spread upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

70277.

Whenever any territory is annexed to the district it shall thereupon become a part of the district subject to all the liabilities and entitled to all the benefits of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Dissolution [80000. - 80007.]

80000.

The board may call an election any time for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether the district will be dissolved. Upon the filing with the clerk of the district of a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total vote cast within the district at the last general statewide election asking that the question of dissolution of the district be submitted to the voters of the district, the board shall call such an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80001.

The election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether or not the district shall be dissolved shall be held within 60 days next succeeding the date on which the petition is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80002.

Notice of any election for dissolution, whether called because of the filing of a petition or ordered by the board without petition, shall be published. The date fixed for the election shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80003.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition the following: Shall the Marin County Transit District be dissolved?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80004.

The board shall canvass the vote. If a majority of the votes favor dissolution, the board shall by resolution dissolve the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80005.

The board shall file a certified copy of the resolution with the Secretary of State and for record in the office of the county recorder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80006.

Upon dissolution the right, title, and interest to property owned or controlled by the district situated within the limits of any city vests absolutely in the city. If such property is situated outside the limits of a city, it vests in the county in which it is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80007.

The board of supervisors is, ex officio, the governing body of the dissolved district. It may levy taxes and assessments and perform other acts necessary to wind up the district affairs and to raise money for the payment of outstanding indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Consolidation with Other Districts [80010. - 80019.]

80010.

The district may be consolidated with any other transit district organized and operating pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 28500) of this division, in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80011.

Whenever the board finds and determines that:

(a) Another transit district is willing to annex the territory comprising the district;

(b) The annexing district has adequate facilities for and is able to supply transit service to the district in a manner equal to or superior to that presently rendered by the district;

(c) Annexation will not result in assumption of financial obligations by the taxpayers of district disproportionate to the services which they will receive; the board
 shall thereafter negotiate an agreement with the annexing district specifying the terms and conditions of annexation and such other matters as are necessary and incidental thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80012.

The board shall thereafter, by resolution setting forth the terms and conditions of the proposed contract at length, declare its intention to cause the agreement to be approved and effect consolidation of district with such other transit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80013.

The resolution, together with a notice fixing the time and place for hearing thereon, shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district. The time fixed for hearing shall not be less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of publication of such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80014.

At the hearing any interested person may file with the board written objections to the approval of the terms and conditions of the proposed contract or the consolidation, or both the proposed contract and the consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80015.

Upon the hearing, the board shall determine whether or not the terms and conditions of the contract will be approved and the consolidation effected, and shall hear and determine all objections thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80016.

Any hearing on the agreement and consolidation may be adjourned from time to time by the board, not exceeding 30 days in all, without further notice other than an order entered upon the minutes of the meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80017.

If no protests are filed, or if the protests filed are overruled and denied by the board, the board shall thereupon by resolution finally approve the terms and conditions of the agreement and proceed with the consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80018.

Thereafter such consolidation shall be effected by such other district in the manner provided for annexation of counties in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 29500), Part 2 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

80019.

Upon the completion of such consolidation procedure, the Marin County Transit District shall be deemed to be dissolved. Thereafter, all property and assets of district which are not subject to the negotiated contract pertaining to consolidation shall be distributed to the County of Marin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. SAN DIEGO COUNTY TRANSIT DISTRICT [90000. - 93017.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [90000. - 90025.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [90000. - 90006.]

90000.

This part shall be known and cited as the “San Diego County Transit District Act of 1965.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90002.

“District” means the San Diego County Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90003.

“Board” means the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90004.

“Voter” means any elector who is registered under the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90005.

“Transit” means the transportation of passengers only and their incidental baggage by means other than by chartered bus, sightseeing bus, or any other motor vehicle not on an individual passenger fare-paying basis. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the district from leasing its buses to public agencies or to private certified public carriers or to prohibit the district from providing schoolbus service for the transportation of pupils between their homes and schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90006.

“Transit works” or “transit facilities” means all real and personal property, equipment, rights, or interests owned or to be acquired by the district for transit service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [90020. - 90025.]

90020.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of California to develop transit system districts in the various metropolitan areas within the state for the benefit of the people. A necessity exists within San Diego County for such a system. Because there is no general law under which this district could perform this distinct function, only a specially created district can operate effectively in the San Diego metropolitan area. Because of the unique problem presented by that metropolitan area, the adoption of a special act and the creation of a special district is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90021.

The San Diego County Transit District may be created as provided in this part and when so created may exercise the powers herein granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90022.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, elections shall be held and conducted and the result ascertained, determined, and declared in all respects as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general elections laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90023.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, all ordinances and notices which are required to be published shall be published within the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90024.

Whenever the signature of any officer or employee of a district or of any member of the retirement board or of any officer or employee of the retirement system is authorized or required under the provisions of this part, except in the single instance provided in Section 90623, the signature may be made by the use of a plate bearing facsimiles of such signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90025.

The district is hereby designated a rapid transit district and the transit facilities and services the district is authorized to acquire, own, operate, control, or use are designated a rapid transit system, for the purposes of Part 15 (commencing with Section 35001) and Part 16 (commencing with Section 36000) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation of District [90050. - 90120.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [90050. - 90050.]

90050.

The area to be embraced in the district shall include all of the corporate area of each of the Cities of San Diego, Chula Vista, Coronado, National City, La Mesa, El Cajon, and Imperial Beach which establish the district as provided in this act, and any unincorporated territory in the County of San Diego contiguous thereto and being served by the San Diego Transit System, which is included in the district by the board of supervisors of the county as provided in this part.

This area shall be subdivided for the purpose of formation into two sections comprising (1) the City of San Diego and (2) the Cities of Coronado, Imperial Beach, Chula Vista, National City, El Cajon, and La Mesa and any unincorporated territories in the County of San Diego contiguous thereto and being served by the San Diego Transit System which is included in the district by the board of supervisors of the county as provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election [90070. - 90078.]

90070.

The Board of Supervisors of San Diego County shall call an election in the area to be included within the district on the question of the formation of the district if either of the two conditions specified below is met:

(a) A petition calling for the formation of the district is filed with the board of supervisors from each of the seven cities specified in Section 90050. Each of the petitions from the seven respective cities shall be signed by a number of signers equal to at least five percent (5%) of the voters registered for the last municipal election in each particular city. A petition may be on
 separate papers, but each paper shall contain the affidavit of the person who circulated it, certifying that each name signed thereto is a true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(b) A resolution of consent calling for the formation of the district is filed with the board of supervisors from each of the city councils of the seven cities specified in Section 90050; provided, that the requirements of this section shall be deemed to have been met if a combination of petitions and resolutions of consent have been filed with the board of supervisors, so long as each of the seven cities specified in Section 90050, either through a petition or by a vote of the city council, has authorized the calling of an election for the formation of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90071.

Each signer of a petition within a particular city shall be a registered voter and resident of that city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90072.

Upon receipt of the resolutions or petitions, or sufficient combination of both, the board of supervisors shall call a hearing thereon not less than 77 days nor more than 91 days following the receipt of all of the required resolutions or petitions, or both. The board of supervisors shall publish notice of said hearing in any newspaper of general circulation published within the proposed district in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code. The notice shall state the name and nature of the proposed district, that all petitions and resolutions may be inspected at the office of the clerk of said board of supervisors, that the proposed district shall include the
 seven cities specified in Section 90050, the boundaries of any unincorporated territory proposed for inclusion, the time and place for the hearing, and that all interested persons shall be given an opportunity to express their views.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90073.

At any time within 30 days following the receipt by the board of supervisors of petitions or resolutions, or both, requiring the calling of an election pursuant to Section 90070, the board of supervisors may adopt a resolution of intention to include within the proposed San Diego County Transit District any unincorporated territory eligible for inclusion in the district as provided in Section 90050, and shall adopt such resolution of intention as to any such unincorporated territory upon receipt within such 30-day period of a petition signed by a number of signers equal to at least 5 percent of the voters registered for the last general election within any such
 territory requesting its inclusion in the proposed district and describing its boundaries. The board of supervisors by its resolution and registered voters by their petitions may propose the inclusion of such unincorporated territory in separate areas which are not themselves contiguous to each other. The board of supervisors shall, upon its adoption, refer such resolution of intention to the San Diego County Local Agency Formation Commission, which shall report to the board of supervisors within 30 days following receipt of the referral.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90074.
